Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.25
Motor vehicle, defined.

Motor vehicle
means any vehicle for which evidence of title is required as a condition precedent
to registration under the laws of this state but does not include trailers.

Motor vehicle
also means any engine, transmission, or rear axle, regardless of whether attached
to a vehicle chassis, that is manufactured for installation in any motor-driven
vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of more than sixteen thousand pounds
for which motor-driven vehicle evidence of title is required as a condition
precedent to registration under the laws of this state.

Laws 2010, LB816, § 37.